FST/Tur/turkish.foma
#Define PSS2P for Dative Case 
define Pss2pDATSG ü n ü z e -> n ü z e || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z e -> ı n ı z a || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> ı n ı z a || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> n ı z a || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z e -> n u z a || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> u n u z a || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> u n u z a || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> i n i z e || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> i n i z e || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z e -> n i z e || ConsAll Vfu "^" _; 

define Pss2pDATPL o -> l a r ı n ı z a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  o -> l a r ı n ı z a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  o -> l a r ı n ı z a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  o -> l e r i n i z e || Vf "^" _ ,,
                  o -> l e r i n i z e || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  o -> l e r i n i z e || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;


#Define PSS2P for Accusative Case
define Pss2pAccSg ü n ü z ü -> n ü z ü || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z ü -> i n i z i || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> i n i z i || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> n i z i || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> ı n ı z ı || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> ı n ı z ı || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> n ı z ı || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> u n u z u || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> u n u z u || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü -> n u z u || ConsAll  Vbr "^" _;

define Pss2pAccPl z -> l e r i n i z i || Vf "^" _ ,,
                  z -> l e r i n i z i || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  z -> l e r i n i z i || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  z -> l a r ı n ı z ı || Vb "^" _ ,,
		  z -> l a r ı n ı z ı || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  z -> l a r ı n ı z ı || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS2P for Genetive Case
define Pss2pGENSg ü n ü z ü n -> n ü z ü n || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z ü n -> i n i z i n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> i n i z i n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> n i z i n || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> u n u z u n || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> u n u z u n || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> n u z u n || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> n ı z ı n || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> ı n ı z ı n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z ü n -> ı n ı z ı n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

define Pss2pGENPl q -> l a r ı n ı z ı n || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  q -> l a r ı n ı z ı n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  q -> l a r ı n ı z ı n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  q -> l e r i n i z i n || Vf "^" _ ,,
		  q -> l e r i n i z i n || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  q -> l e r i n i z i n || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS2P for Ablative Case
define Pss2pABLSg ü n ü z d e n -> n ü z d e n || ConsAll Vfr "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z d e n -> n i z d e n || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> i n i z d e n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> i n i z d e n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> n ı z d a n || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> ı n ı z d a n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> ı n ı z d a n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> u n u z d a n || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> u n u z d a n || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e n -> n u z d a n || ConsAll Vbr "^" _;

define Pss2pABLPl w -> l e r i n i z d e n || Vf "^" _ ,,
                  w -> l e r i n i z d e n || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  w -> l e r i n i z d e n || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  w -> l a r ı n ı z d a n || Vb "^" _ ,,
		  w -> l a r ı n ı z d a n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  w -> l a r ı n ı z d a n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS2P for Locative Case
define Pss2pLOCSg ü n ü z d e -> n ı z d a || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z d e -> ı n ı z d a || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> ı n ı z d a || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> u n u z d a || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> u n u z d a || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> n u z d a || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> n i z d e || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> i n i z d e || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  ü n ü z d e -> i n i z d e || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n ü z d e -> n ü z d e || ConsAll Vfr "^" _;

define Pss2pLOCPl x -> l e r i n i z d e || Vf "^" _ ,,
                  x -> l e r i n i z d e || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  x -> l e r i n i z d e || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  x -> l a r ı n ı z d a || Vb "^" _ ,,
		  x -> l a r ı n ı z d a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  x -> l a r ı n ı z d a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;


#Define PSS2S for Nominative Case
define Pss2sNOMSg ü n -> i n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
                  ü n -> i n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n -> n || ConsAll [ Vf | Vb ] "^" _ ,,
		  ü n -> ı n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n -> ı n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n -> u n || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  ü n -> u n || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

define Pss2sNOMPl r ı n -> l e r i n || Vf "^" _ ,,
                  r ı n -> l e r i n || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  r ı n -> l e r i n || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  r ı n -> l a r ı n || Vb "^" _ ,,
		  r ı n -> l a r ı n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  r ı n -> l a r ı n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS2S for Dative Case
define Pss2sDATSg m -> n e || ConsAll Vf "^" _ ,,
                  m -> ı n a || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m -> ı n a || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m -> n a || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  m -> i n e || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m -> i n e || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m -> n a || ConsAll Vb "^" _ ,,
		  m -> ü n e || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  m -> ü n e || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

define Pss2sDATPl l e r i n e -> l a r ı n a || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l e r i n e -> l a r ı n a || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l e r i n e -> l a r ı n a || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#Define PSS2S for Genetive Case
define Pss2sGENSg n -> n i n || ConsAll Vfu "^" _ ,,
                  n -> i n i n || Vfu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> i n i n || Vfu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> ı n ı n || Vbu ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> ı n ı n || Vbu ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> n ı n || ConsAll Vbu "^" _ ,,
		  n -> n u n || ConsAll Vbr "^" _ ,,
		  n -> u n u n || Vbr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> u n u n || Vbr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> ü n ü n || Vfr ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> ü n ü n || Vfr ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  n -> n ü n || ConsAll Vfr "^" _;

define Pss2sGENPl l -> l a r ı n ı n || Vb "^" _ ,,
                  l -> l a r ı n ı n || Vb ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l -> l a r ı n ı n || Vb ConsAll ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l -> l e r i n i n || Vf "^" _ ,,
		  l -> l e r i n i n || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
		  l -> l e r i n i n || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _; 



#Define CI alternations
define CIalternations ç -> c || _ "^" Vall ,,
                      c -> ç || _ "^" ConsAll;


#Define K Alternations
define KAlternations k -> ğ || _ "^" Vall;

#Define D Alternations
#define DAlternation d -> t || _ "^" ConsAll ,,
  #                  t -> d || _ "^" Vall;

#Delete (S)I in some cases
define SIdeletion s bufI -> 0 || _ "^" s bufI ,,
                  s bufI -> 0 || _ "^" l bufA r bufI ,,
		  s bufI -> 0 || [ l bufI | l bufI k | s bufI z | Cbuf I ] "^" _ ,,
                  s bufI -> 0 || %^%(y%) bufA s bufI "^" _;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;


read lexc tur_nouns.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon                 .o.
               PluralAlternation       .o.
	       DativeSgAlternations    .o.
	       DativePlAlternations    .o.
	       LocativePl              .o.
	       LocativeSg              .o.
	       GenetiveSg              .o.
	       GenetivePl              .o.
	       AccusativeSg            .o.
	       AccusativePl            .o.
	       AbulativeSg             .o.
	       AbulativePl             .o.
	       Pss1pNomSg              .o.
	       Pss1pNomPl              .o.
	       Pss1pDatSg              .o.
	       Pss1pDatPl              .o.
	       Pss1pGenSg              .o.
	       Pss1pGenPl              .o.
	       Pss1pAccSg              .o.
	       Pss1pAccPl              .o.
	       Pss1pAblSg              .o.
               Pss1pAblPl              .o.
	       Pss1pLOCSG              .o.
	       Pss1pLOCPL              .o.
	       Pss2pNomSG              .o.
	       Pss2pNomPl              .o.
	       Pss2pDATSG              .o.
	       Pss2pDATPL              .o.
	       Pss2pAccSg              .o.
               Pss2pAccPl              .o.
	       Pss2pGENSg              .o.
	       Pss2pGENPl              .o.
	       Pss2pABLSg              .o.
	       Pss2pABLPl              .o.
	       Pss2pLOCSg              .o.
	       Pss2pLOCPl              .o.
	       Pss2sNOMSg              .o.
	       Pss2sNOMPl              .o.
	       Pss2sDATSg              .o.
	       Pss2sDATPl              .o.
	       Pss2sGENSg              .o.
	       Pss2sGENPl              .o.
	       CIalternations          .o.
#	       DAlternation            .o.
 	       KAlternations           .o.
	       SIdeletion              .o.
               Cleanup;

regex Grammar;

#define Buffer O -> l e r || Vf "^" _ ,,
     #         O -> l e r || Vf ConsAll "^" _ ,,
#	      O -> l e r || Vf ConsAll ConsAll "^" _;

#regex Grammar .o. Buffer;
#Define K Alternations
#define KAlternations k -> ğ || Vall "^" _;
#regex KAltenations .P. Grammar;
